District of Columbia statutes.
2-1411.03

Functions.

The functions of the Office shall be to:

(1)

Educate the public, including District residents and employers, about Unit A of this chapter (“Human Rights Act”);

(2)

Undertake investigations and public hearings on racial, religious, or ethnic group tensions, prejudice, intolerance, bigotry, disorder, and on any form of unlawful discrimination pursuant to the Human Rights Act;

(3)

Receive, review, and investigate complaints of unlawful discrimination in employment, housing, public accommodations, or educational institutions;

(4)

Receive and investigate complaints of violations of § 32-501 et seq. and § 32-1201 et seq. and take appropriate enforcement action regarding these complaints;

(5)

Mediate complaints of unlawful discrimination in employment, housing, public accommodations, or educational institutions to help parties to a complaint reach a voluntary settlement;

(6)

Conciliate complaints of unlawful discrimination in employment, housing, public accommodations, or educational institutions, after the Office has made a finding of probable cause to believe that an act of unlawful discrimination has occurred, to help the parties to a complaint reach a voluntary settlement;

(7)

Certify a complaint to the Office of the Corporation Counsel for legal action needed, in the Director’s judgment, to preserve the status quo or to prevent irreparable harm to a party to the complaint;

(8)

Forward to the Commission on Human Rights, for a hearing, decision, and order, any complaint that has resulted in a finding of probable cause by the Office; and

(9)

Issue, adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind such rules and procedures as the Director deems necessary to effectuate the provisions of this subtitle, in accordance with procedures promulgated pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 204, 46 DCR 6373
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 8, 48 DCR 1873

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-313 added par. (9).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter IV, see notes following § 2-1411.01.